District of Columbia statutes.
46-356.13

Jurisdiction to modify child-support order of another state when individual parties reside in the District.

(a)

If all of the parties who are individuals reside in the District and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of the District has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state’s child-support order in a proceeding to register that order.

(b)

A tribunal of the District exercising jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of subchapter I [§ 46-351.01] and II [§ 46-352.01], this subchapter, and the procedural and substantive law of the District to the proceeding for enforcement or modification. Subchapters III, IV, V, VII, and VIII [§§ 46-353.01 through 46-355.07 and §§ 46-357.01 through 46-358.02] do not apply.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 613, 63 DCR 222